Utah statutes.
31A-11-109.   Alteration or revocation of certificate of authority.
If the commissioner issues an order under Chapter 27, Part 5, Administrative
Actions, against a motor club, the commissioner may revoke its certificate of
authority or issue a new one with the limits the commissioner considers
necessary.
